District of Columbia statutes.
29A-221.13

Repealed

Receiver subject to court’s direction; compensation.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1318, ch. 854, § 780
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(3), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-713.
1981 Ed., § 29-413.
2001 Ed., § 29-221.13.